Florida, session 2026, HB281.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 490.016, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
490.016 Use of artificial intelligence.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "artificial
intelligence" means any machine-based system that varies in
level of autonomy and that, for any explicit or implicit
objective, infers from the inputs the system receives how to
generate outputs, including, but not limited to, content,
decisions, predictions, or recommendations that can influence
physical or virtual environments.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
licensee may not use artificial intelligence in the practice of
psychology or school psychology. A licensee may use artificial
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb281-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 281 2026
intelligence to:
(a) Assist in administrative or supplementary support
services. Administrative and supplementary support services
include, but are not limited to, all of the following:
1. Managing appointment scheduling and reminders.
2. Drafting general communications related to therapy
logistics that do not involve therapeutic advice.
3. Processing billing and insurance claims.
4. Preparing and managing patient records.
5. Analyzing data for operational purposes.
(b) Record or transcribe a counseling or therapy session
if a licensee obtains written, informed consent at least 24
hours before the provision of services.
Section 2. Section 491.019, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
491.019 Use of artificial intelligence.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "artificial
intelligence" means any machine-based system that varies in
level of autonomy and that, for any explicit or implicit
objective, infers from the inputs the system receives how to
generate outputs, including, but not limited to, content,
decisions, predictions, or recommendations that can influence
physical or virtual environments.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
licensee, registered intern, or certificateholder may not use
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb281-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 281 2026
artificial intelligence in the practice of clinical social work,
marriage and family therapy, or mental health counseling. A
licensee, registered intern, or certificateholder may use
artificial intelligence to:
(a) Assist in administrative or supplementary support
services. Administrative and supplementary support services
include, but are not limited to, all of the following:
1. Managing appointment scheduling and reminders.
2. Drafting general communications related to therapy
logistics that do not involve therapeutic advice.
3. Processing billing and insurance claims.
4. Preparing and managing patient records.
5. Analyzing data for operational purposes.
(b) Record or transcribe a counseling or therapy session
if a licensee, registered intern, or certificateholder obtains
written, informed consent at least 24 hours before the provision
of services.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb281-00